kpv.aff
FLAG long
SFX V7 Y 330 # +ы
SFX V7 0 ыд .
SFX V7 0 ыс .
SFX V7 0 ыссьыд .
SFX V7 0 ыссьым .
SFX V7 0 ыссьыныд .
SFX V7 0 ыссьыным .
SFX V7 0 ыссьыныс .
SFX V7 0 ыссьыс .
SFX V7 0 ысся .
SFX V7 0 ыссяныд .
SFX V7 0 ыссяным .
SFX V7 0 ыссяныс .
SFX V7 0 ыссянь .
SFX V7 0 ыссяньныд .
SFX V7 0 ыссяньным .
SFX V7 0 ыссяньныс .
SFX V7 0 ыссяньыд .
SFX V7 0 ыссяньым .
SFX V7 0 ыссяньыс .
SFX V7 0 ыссяыд .
SFX V7 0 ыссяыс .
SFX V7 0 ысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьджык .
SFX V7 0 ысьджыкӧсь .
SFX V7 0 ыськӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьла .
SFX V7 0 ысьлань .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьным .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдз .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдзныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдзным .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдзныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдзыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдзым .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдзыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдным .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдым .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьӧдыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсьыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсьым .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсьыныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсьыным .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсьыныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсьыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсяньныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсяньным .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсяньныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсяньыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьсяньыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьтіныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьтіным .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьтіныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьтіыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьтіым .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьтіыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьым .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьын .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланьысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьланяд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланям .
SFX V7 0 ысьланяныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьланяным .
SFX V7 0 ысьланяныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьланяс .
SFX V7 0 ысьлӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьлы .
SFX V7 0 ысьлысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьнад .
SFX V7 0 ысьнам .
SFX V7 0 ысьнаныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьнаным .
SFX V7 0 ысьнаныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьнас .
SFX V7 0 ысьныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьныдкӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьныдла .
SFX V7 0 ысьныдлань .
SFX V7 0 ысьныдлӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьныдлы .
SFX V7 0 ысьныдлысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьным .
SFX V7 0 ысьнымкӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьнымла .
SFX V7 0 ысьнымлань .
SFX V7 0 ысьнымлӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьнымлы .
SFX V7 0 ысьнымлысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьнымӧс .
SFX V7 0 ысьныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьныскӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьнысла .
SFX V7 0 ысьныслань .
SFX V7 0 ысьныслӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьныслы .
SFX V7 0 ысьныслысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьнысӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьнытӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдз .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдзныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдзным .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдзныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдзыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдзым .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдзыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдным .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдым .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧдыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧй .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧйкӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧйла .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧйлань .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧйланьсянь .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧйлӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧйлы .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧйлысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧйся .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧйсянь .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧйтӧг .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧс .
SFX V7 0 ысьӧсь .
SFX V7 0 ысьсӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьті .
SFX V7 0 ысьтіныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьтіным .
SFX V7 0 ысьтіныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьтіыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьтіым .
SFX V7 0 ысьтіыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьтӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьтӧг .
SFX V7 0 ысьтӧгныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьтӧгным .
SFX V7 0 ысьтӧгныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьтӧгыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьтӧгыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьыдкӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьыдла .
SFX V7 0 ысьыдлӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьыдлы .
SFX V7 0 ысьыдлысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьын .
SFX V7 0 ысьыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьыскӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьысла .
SFX V7 0 ысьыслӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьыслы .
SFX V7 0 ысьыслысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьяс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясад .
SFX V7 0 ысьясам .
SFX V7 0 ысьясанӧй .
SFX V7 0 ысьясаныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясаным .
SFX V7 0 ысьясаныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясас .
SFX V7 0 ысьяскӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясла .
SFX V7 0 ысьяслань .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьным .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдзныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдзным .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдзныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдзыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдзым .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдзыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдным .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдым .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьӧдыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсьыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсьым .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсьыныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсьыным .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсьыныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсьыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсяньныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсяньным .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсяньныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсяньыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьсяньыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьтіныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьтіным .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьтіныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьтіыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьтіым .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьтіыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьым .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланьыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланяд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланям .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланяныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланяным .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланяныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясланяс .
SFX V7 0 ысьяслӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьяслы .
SFX V7 0 ысьяслысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснад .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснам .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснаныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснаным .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснаныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснас .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныдкӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныдла .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныдлань .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныдлӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныдлы .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныдлысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьясным .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснымкӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснымла .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснымлань .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснымлӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснымлы .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснымлысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснымӧс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныскӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснысла .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныслань .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныслӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныслы .
SFX V7 0 ысьясныслысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснысӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьяснытӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдз .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдзныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдзным .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдзныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдзыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдзым .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдзыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдным .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдым .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧдыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧй .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧйкӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧйла .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧйлань .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧйланьсянь .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧйлӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧйлы .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧйлысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧйся .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧйсянь .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧйтӧг .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьясӧс .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссьыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссьым .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссьыныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссьыным .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссьыныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссьыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясся .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяным .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссянь .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяньныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяньным .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяньныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяньыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяньым .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяньыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьяссяыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясті .
SFX V7 0 ысьястіныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьястіным .
SFX V7 0 ысьястіныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьястіыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьястіым .
SFX V7 0 ысьястіыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьястӧ .
SFX V7 0 ысьястӧг .
SFX V7 0 ысьястӧгныд .
SFX V7 0 ысьястӧгным .
SFX V7 0 ысьястӧгныс .
SFX V7 0 ысьястӧгыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьястӧгыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыдкӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыдла .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыдлӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыдлы .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыдлысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьясын .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыс .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыскӧд .
SFX V7 0 ысьясысла .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыслӧн .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыслы .
SFX V7 0 ысьясыслысь .
SFX V7 0 ысьясысь .
SFX V7 0 ысяд .
SFX V7 0 ысям .
SFX V7 0 ысянӧй .
SFX V7 0 ысяныд .
SFX V7 0 ысяным .
SFX V7 0 ысяныс .
SFX V7 0 ысяс .

SFX W1 Y 5 # ыны 2598
SFX W1 ыны 0/V1 .
SFX W1 ыны 0/V3 .
SFX W1 ыны 0/V6 .
SFX W1 ыны 0/V7 .
SFX W1 ны 0/V5 .

SFX W2 Y 5 # [слнтд]ыны 61863
SFX W2 ыны 0/V1 .
SFX W2 ыны 0/V4 .
SFX W2 ыны 0/V6 .
SFX W2 ыны 0/V7 .
SFX W2 ны 0/V5 .

SFX W3 Y 5 # ьыны 17227
SFX W3 ьыны 0/V2 .
SFX W3 ьыны 0/V3 .
SFX W3 ыны 0/V6 .
SFX W3 ыны 0/V7 .
SFX W3 ны 0/V5 .

SFX W4 Y 5 # [^д]зыны 45
SFX W4 ыны 0/V1 .
SFX W4 ыны 0/V4 .
SFX W4 ыны 0/V6 .
SFX W4 ыны 0/V7 .
SFX W4 ны 0/V5 .

SFX W5 Y 5 #  дзыны 10
SFX W5 ыны 0/V1 .
SFX W5 ыны 0/V3 .
SFX W5 ыны 0/V6 .
SFX W5 ыны 0/V7 .
SFX W5 ны 0/V5 .

SFX W6 Y 5 #  йыны 191
SFX W6 йыны ъ/V2 .
SFX W6 ыны 0/V3 .
SFX W6 ыны 0/V6 .
SFX W6 ыны 0/V7 .
SFX W6 ны 0/V5 .

SFX W7 Y 5 #  ййыны 3
SFX W7 йыны 0/V2 .
SFX W7 ыны 0/V3 .
SFX W7 ыны 0/V6 .
SFX W7 ыны 0/V7 .
SFX W7 ны 0/V5 .

SFX W8 Y 5 #  ьйыны 4
SFX W8 ыны 0/V2 .
SFX W8 ыны 0/V3 .
SFX W8 ыны 0/V6 .
SFX W8 ыны 0/V7 .
SFX W8 ны 0/V5 .

SFX U8 Y 5 # гыны, кыны, жыны 3
SFX U8 ны 0/V1 .
SFX U8 ны 0/V3 .
SFX U8 ны 0/V6 .
SFX U8 ны 0/V7 .
SFX U8 ны 0/V5 .

SFX X1 Y 9 # отрицание
SFX X1 0 ӧ .
SFX X1 0 ӧй .
SFX X1 0 джык .
SFX X1 0 кодь .
SFX X1 0 ыд .
SFX X1 0 ыс .
SFX X1 0 сӧ .
SFX X1 0 тӧ .
PFX X1 0 м' .

SFX Y1 Y 6 # экзистенциал
SFX Y1 0 сьыд .
SFX Y1 0 сьыд .
SFX Y1 0 тӧ .
SFX Y1 0 сӧ .
SFX Y1 0 ӧсь .
SFX Y1 0 нас .

SFX Y2 Y 1 # экзистенциал неизмен
SFX Y2 0 0 .

SFX Z1 Y 1 # звукоподр.
SFX Z1 0 0 .
